Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 7A Long-term Care Partnership Program

49-4-160.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Long-term Care Partnership Program Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 823, § 1/HB 643; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 49/SB 465.

Cross references.

Long-term care insurance, §

33-42-1

et seq.

49-4-161.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Asset disregard” means, with regard to state Medicaid benefits, the disregard of any assets or resources in an amount equal to the insurance benefit payments that are made to or on behalf of an individual who is a beneficiary under a qualified long-term care insurance partnership policy.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Insurance.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Georgia Qualified Long-term Care Partnership Program approved policy” means a long-term care insurance policy that meets the model regulations and requirements of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ long-term care insurance model regulation and long-term care insurance model act as specified in 42 U.S.C. Section 1917(b) and Section 6021 of the Federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005 and the Commissioner certifies such policy as meeting these requirements.

“State Medicaid program” means the medical assistance program established in this state under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

“State plan amendment” means a state Medicaid plan amendment made to the federal Department of Health and Human Services that provides for the disregard of any assets or resources in an amount equal to the insurance benefit payments that are made to or on behalf of an individual who is a beneficiary under a qualified long-term care insurance partnership policy.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 823, § 1/HB 643; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 49/SB 465; Ga. L. 2006, p. 185, § 1/HB 1451; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 49/SB 46.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 49, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2006, p. 185, § 1. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

49-4-162.
Program established; purposes; assets to be disregarded with respect to Medicaid eligibility or payment or recovery by the state of payments for medical services.

In accordance with Section 6021 of the Federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, there is established the Georgia Qualified Long-term Care Partnership Program which shall be administered by the Department of Community Health, with the assistance of the Commissioner and the Department of Human Services, and which shall be for the following purposes:

To provide incentives for individuals to insure against the costs of providing for their long-term care needs;

To provide a mechanism for individuals to qualify for coverage of the cost of their long-term care needs under the state Medicaid program without first being required to substantially exhaust their resources;

To provide counseling services through the Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services to individuals in planning of their long-term care needs; and

To alleviate the financial burden on the state’s Medicaid program by encouraging the pursuit of private initiatives.

Upon the exhaustion of benefits or upon the diminishment of assets below the anticipated remaining benefits under a Georgia Qualified Long-term Care Partnership Program approved policy, certain assets of an individual, as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, shall not be considered when determining any of the following:

Medicaid eligibility;

The amount of any Medicaid payment; and

Any subsequent recovery by the state of a payment for medical services.

The department shall:

Not later than November 15, 2006, make application to the federal Department of Health and Human Services for a state plan amendment to establish that the assets an individual owns and may retain under Medicaid and still qualify for benefits under Medicaid at the time the individual applies for benefits is increased dollar for dollar for each dollar paid out under the individual’s long-term care insurance policy if the individual is the beneficiary of a qualified long-term care insurance partnership policy purchased through the Georgia Qualified Long-term Care Partnership Program; and

Provide information and technical assistance to the Commissioner to assure that any individual who sells a qualified long-term care insurance partnership policy receives training and demonstrates evidence of an understanding of such policies and how they relate to other public and private coverage of long-term care.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 823, § 1/HB 643; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 49/SB 465; Ga. L. 2006, p. 185, § 2/HB 1451; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 49/SB 465, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2006, p. 185, § 2/HB 1451. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “Georgia Qualified Long-term Care Partnership Program” was substituted for “Georgia Long-term Care Partnership Program” in subsection (a) and paragraph (c)(1), and “Not later than November 15, 2006” was substituted for “Within 180 days of the effective date of this Code section” at the beginning of paragraph (c)(1).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “of Insurance” was deleted following “Commissioner” in the introductory language of subsection (a).

49-4-163.
Eligibility for asset disregard; reciprocal agreements with other states to extend asset disregard mutually.

An individual who is a beneficiary of a Georgia Qualified Long-term Care Partnership Program approved policy is eligible for assistance under the state Medicaid program using asset disregard pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c) of Code Section 49-4-162.

If the Georgia Qualified Long-term Care Partnership Program is discontinued, an individual who purchased a Georgia Qualified Long-term Care Partnership Program approved policy prior to the date the program was discontinued shall be eligible to receive asset disregard if allowed as provided by Title VI, Section 6021 of the Federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005.

The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states to extend the asset disregard to residents of the state who purchase long-term care policies in another state which has asset disregard provisions as established under this article as provided by Title VI, Section 6021 of the Federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 823, § 1/HB 643; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 49/SB 465; Ga. L. 2006, p. 185, § 3/HB 1451.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “Georgia Qualified Long-term Care Partnership Program” was substituted for “‘Georgia
Long-term Care Partnership Program” near the beginning of subsection (b).

49-4-164.
Requirements for selling qualified long-term care insurance partnership policies; rules and regulations; reports.

The Commissioner shall:

Develop requirements to ensure that any individual who sells a qualified long-term care insurance partnership policy receives training and demonstrates evidence of an understanding of such policies and how they relate to other public and private coverage of long-term care; and

Not impose any requirement affecting the terms or benefits of qualified long-term care partnership policies unless the Commissioner imposes such a requirement on all long-term care policies sold in this state without regard to whether the policy is covered under the partnership or is offered in connection with such partnership.

The department and the Commissioner are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement and administer the provisions of this article.

The issuers of qualified long-term care partnership policies in this state shall provide regular reports to both the secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with federal law and regulations and to the department and the Commissioner as provided in Section 6021 of the Federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 823, § 1/HB 643; Ga. L. 2006, p. 185, § 4/HB 1451.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “secretary of the United States” was substituted for “Secretary of the” in subsection (c).

49-4-165.
Notice to consumers.

A qualified long-term care insurance partnership policy shall contain a summary notice to the consumer in plain language on the current law pertaining to asset disregard and asset tests.

The notice to the consumer under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be developed by the Commissioner of Insurance.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-165

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 823, § 1/HB 643; Ga. L. 2006, p. 185, § 5/HB 1451.

49-4-166.
[Repealed] Effective date.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-166

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 823, § 1/HB 643; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 185 § 6/HB 1451, effective April 19, 2006.